North Dakota statutes. TITLE 19 Foods, Drugs, Oils, and Compounds
CHAPTER 19-18 Pesticide Registration [Repealed]

19-18-01.
Short title. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 219, § 52.

19-18-02.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 182, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 19-1802; S.L. 1971, ch. 239, §§ 1, 2, 4; 1985, ch. 258, §§ 44, 45; 1987, ch. 263, § 18; 1989, ch. 34, § 19; 1989, ch. 272, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1995, ch. 219, § 19; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2003, ch. 186, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-18-02.1.
Environment and rangeland protection fund. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 227, § 1; 2001, ch. 9, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-18-02.2.
Advisory board — Creation — Duties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 186, § 6.

19-18-03.
Prohibited acts. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 182, § 3; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 19-1803; S.L. 1971, ch. 239, § 5; 1985, ch. 258, § 46; 1985, ch. 267, § 1; 1989, ch. 272, § 2; 1995, ch. 219, § 21; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-18-04.
Registration — Fees. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 182, § 4; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 19-1804; S.L. 1971, ch. 239, § 6; 1983, ch. 254, § 8; 1985, ch. 258, § 47; 1987, ch. 263, § 19; 1989, ch. 69, § 11; 1989, ch. 272, § 3; 1991, ch. 227, § 3; 1995, ch. 219, § 22; 1995, ch. 221, § 1; 1997, ch. 208, § 3; 1999, ch. 31, § 4; 2001, ch. 9, § 5; 2003, ch. 186, § 3; 2003, ch. 187, § 1; 2005, ch. 9, § 12; 2007, ch. 215, § 1; 2009, ch. 9, § 12; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-18-04.1.
Reporting requirements. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 226, § 1; 1995, ch. 219, § 23; 2003, ch. 186, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-18-04.2.
Protection of trade secrets. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 226, § 2; 1995, ch. 219, § 24; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-18-05.
Determinations — Rules — Uniformity. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 182, § 5; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 19-1805; S.L. 1971, ch. 239, § 7; 1981, ch. 336, § 18; 1985, ch. 258, § 48; 1989, ch. 272, § 4; 1995, ch. 219, § 25; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-18-06.
Enforcement. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 182, § 6; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 19-1806; S.L. 1985, ch. 258, § 49; 1989, ch. 272, § 5; 1995, ch. 219, § 26; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-18-06.1.
Stop-sale orders. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 239, § 3; 1985, ch. 258, § 50; 1989, ch. 272, § 6; 1995, ch. 219, § 27; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-18-07.
Exemptions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 182, § 7; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 19-1807; S.L. 1985, ch. 258, § 51; 1987, ch. 263, § 20; 1989, ch. 272, § 7; 1995, ch. 219, § 28; 2003, ch. 186, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-18-08.
Penalties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 182, § 8; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 19-1808; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 190; 1989, ch. 272, § 8; 1991, ch. 226, § 3; 1995, ch. 219, § 29; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-18-09.
Seizures. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 182, § 9; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 19-1809; S.L. 1989, ch. 272, § 9; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-18-10.
Delegation of duties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 182, § 10; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 19-1810; S.L. 1989, ch. 272, § 10; 1995, ch. 219, § 30; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-18-11.
Cooperation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 182, § 11; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 19-1811; S.L. 1971, ch. 239, § 8; 1989, ch. 272, § 11; 1995, ch. 219, § 31; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-18-12.
Experimental use permits. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 188, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-18-13.
Minimum-risk pesticide — Certificate of exemption. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 202, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.